California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(3) The fee for six to 10 properties shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(4) The fee for 11 or more properties shall be two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(b) The fees specified in this section are applicable to the 2010 license year, and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 394, Sec. 10.   (AB 1423)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3243.5.

The commission may transfer a commercial hunting club license to other land owned or controlled by the licensee, in the same county as the originally licensed land, without an additional fee, if the commission finds the new land suitable for the purposes of the license and the transfer does not conflict with the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 69.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3245.

Commercial hunting club licenses are valid for a term of one year from July 1st, or, if issued after the beginning of such term, for the remainder thereof. A license authorizes the person to whom it is issued to maintain a hunting club in accordance with the provisions of this code and such regulations as the commission may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 248.)
-------------------------------------------

3246.

Any license issued under this article may be revoked by the commission at one of the commission’s regularly scheduled meetings, or by a court of competent jurisdiction, upon the licensee’s conviction of a violation of this code, and no new license may be issued to the licensee during the same license year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1244, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licensed Domesticated Game Bird Hunting Clubs [3270. - 3270.]

3270.

In order to provide additional hunting by stocking domestically propagated game birds, and to permit the taking of game birds under conditions that will not conflict with the public interest, any person who owns or controls the hunting rights on a tract of land may apply to the department for a game bird club license authorizing the taking of game birds upon that land in accordance with the regulations of the commission for the administration, including the implementation and enforcement, of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 66.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licensed Domesticated Migratory Game Bird Shooting Areas [3300. - 3311.]

3300.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in the raising and releasing, or the releasing, of domesticated migratory game birds for shooting by persons who pay for that privilege, unless the person has a revocable nontransferable license issued by the department. The licenses may be issued annually by the department and shall be valid from July 1 through the following June 30, upon payment of a base fee of eighty dollars ($80), as adjusted under Section 713.

Any bird of a species included in the definition of migratory game birds, as defined in Section 3500, which has been held live in captivity is a “domesticated migratory game bird” for purposes of this section, except such a bird that has been released from captivity and any control before attaining six weeks of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1368, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

3301.

The application for a license shall show the size and location of the area to be licensed. If an application is approved and a license is issued, the licensee shall post the boundaries of the licensed area with signs, at intervals of not more than 500 feet, which shall indicate that the area is licensed for the shooting of domesticated migratory game birds. Such signs shall be of a size not less than 12 by 18 inches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.

The commission may prescribe additional regulations deemed necessary for the releasing and shooting of domesticated migratory game birds and shall set the season and areas where such birds may be taken. If the licensee violates any of the provisions of this article or any regulations made pursuant thereto, the commission may cancel or revoke the license provided notice has been given to the licensee and he has been given an opportunity to be heard by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

3303.

Where domesticated migratory game birds are reared or held for release by the licensee, the licensee shall provide proper and adequate care for the birds and shall raise and hold them only under sanitary conditions. Conditions for proper care and raising shall be prescribed by the commission. The licensee shall provide for the inspection of birds and facilities upon the request of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

3305.

All domesticated migratory game birds at time of release for shooting shall be at least 14 weeks of age, capable of strong and sustained flight, fully feathered, and otherwise in condition to survive in the wild. Birds that are altered in any manner which would, in the opinion of the department, render them incapable of normal sustained flight, or which are diseased, or show evidence of malnutrition or injury, shall not be released.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

3306.

Shooting shall be confined to blinds, except for shooting necessary to recover a downed and injured bird, and not more than three shooters shall occupy or use each blind. Such blinds shall be constructed to prevent the shooting of domestic migratory game birds over water and to insure maximum safety to occupants of adjoining blinds.

The blinds shall be so situated that the occupants of the blinds cannot see the release site.

The licensee shall not permit any shooting within 500 feet of a point where the birds are released, nor shall any birds be taken within such distance from the point of release.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

3307.

All birds killed or injured by shooters shall be retrieved without delay, and all injured birds shall be humanely dispatched. The licensee shall not permit injured birds to remain on a pond or feeding area, nor shall he knowingly permit such birds to be used in any subsequent release.

In order to prevent the loss of any dead or injured birds, the licensee shall provide the use of a retrieving dog, without cost, to all shooters, except that shooters may provide their own retrieving dogs. The licensee shall not permit the shooting of any birds unless a retrieving dog is immediately available for use by all shooters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

3308.

Licensees shall pay the department an inspection fee not to exceed five cents ($0.05) for each domesticated migratory game bird raised or used on a licensed area to insure proper adherence to these regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

3309.

No dead, domesticated migratory game bird shall be removed from the premises of a licensed area until there is securely attached to the carcass a seal, and such seal shall remain attached to the carcass until it is finally prepared for consumption. Each such seal shall be supplied by the department at a fee set by the commission not to exceed five cents ($0.05).

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

3310.

It shall be unlawful for any person to shoot domesticated migratory game birds on a licensed area without having a valid hunting license as provided by Section 3031.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

3311.

The licensee shall comply with all applicable federal laws or regulations relating to the releasing and shooting of domesticated migratory game birds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Enhancement and Management of Fish and Wildlife and their Habitat on Private Lands [3400. - 3408.]

3400.

It is the policy of the state actively to ensure the improvement of wildlife habitat on private land in order to encourage the propagation, utilization, and conservation of fish and wildlife resources on those lands now and for the future in cooperation with private landowners. The commission and the department may develop a private wildlife habitat enhancement and management program for the implementation of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 818, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3401.

(a) The commission may authorize the department to issue revocable, nontransferable licenses for the operation of wildlife habitat enhancement and management areas on any private lands it determines are suitable for habitat enhancement, management, utilization, propagation, and conservation of fish and wildlife resources of those lands. Any private lands affected by a habitat enhancement and management plan licensed pursuant to this article shall not be available for use by the general public without the consent of the landholders. No public access road shall be closed to the public under this article as a result of licensing a wildlife habitat enhancement and management area or implementing the wildlife habitat enhancement and management plan.

(b) The commission shall authorize hunting during the rut only in a wildlife habitat enhancement and management area when that hunting is consistent with the management plans prepared for that area or herd and does not result in an overall negative effect on the deer herd population in that area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 818, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3402.

(a) A license for a wildlife habitat enhancement and management area may be issued to any landholder or combination of landholders upon approval by the commission of an application submitted by the landholder. As used in this article, “landholder” means any person who owns, leases, or has a possessory interest in land.

(b) Each license application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee in an amount established by the commission which, in conjunction with the fees collected pursuant to Section 3407, is calculated to meet the department’s actual costs in administering all aspects of the habitat enhancement and management program. The application shall be accompanied by a wildlife habitat enhancement and management plan and such other information about the proposed wildlife habitat enhancement and management area as may be required by the commission.

(c) An application for a license may be submitted by any number of landholders if all parcels to be included in the wildlife habitat enhancement and management area are contiguous and, in combination, are of a size suitable for the management of the species included in the wildlife habitat enhancement and management plan. The landholders shall designate one landholder who shall represent them in all dealings with the commission and the department. The designated landholder shall be responsible for the operation of the wildlife habitat enhancement and management area.

(d) A landholder who does not own the fee to the land may apply for a license pursuant to this article only if the owner signs the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 818, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3403.

The commission shall require the landowners of a wildlife habitat enhancement and management area to post all or part of its boundaries with public land. The commission may require the owners of a wildlife habitat enhancement and management area to post all or part of its boundaries with private land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 818, Sec. 3.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3404.

(a) The commission may adopt regulations necessary for the administration of this article.

(b) After notice and a hearing, the commission may revoke the license for any violation of any provision of this code or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto or for any violation of the terms of the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

3406.

(a) Upon approval of the wildlife habitat enhancement and management plan, the department shall issue a license, which shall be valid for five calendar years, authorizing the taking of those species of fish, game birds, and game mammals designated in the wildlife habitat enhancement and management plan, pursuant to the plan and regulations of the commission for the operation of the wildlife habitat enhancement and management area. Regulations adopted pursuant to this section may supersede any provision of this code designated by number in the regulation, but shall do so only to the extent specifically provided in the regulation.

(b) During the first year of operation of a wildlife habitat enhancement and management area under a wildlife habitat enhancement and management plan and, thereafter, until the operator demonstrates habitat enhancement in the area acceptable to the department, no person shall take, and the plan shall not authorize the taking, of deer except during the general open season and consistent with the bag and possession limits for the fish and game district or the zone in which the wildlife habitat enhancement and management area is located.

(c) The activities conducted pursuant to each wildlife habitat enhancement and management plan shall be reviewed annually by the department and reviewed by the commission at a public hearing. Each licensee shall annually submit information to the department about past activities and the activities intended to be conducted in the succeeding year. Any change to the wildlife habitat enhancement and management plan or the regulations applicable to the wildlife habitat enhancement and management area shall be proposed to the commission by the department or the licensee at the license review hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 818, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3407.

(a) The commission may require that any fish, bird, or mammal taken in a wildlife habitat enhancement and management area licensed pursuant to this article be marked for identification with a distinctive tag or seal issued by the department prior to being removed from the area.

(b) A deer tag shall be countersigned by a person authorized to do so by Section 4341.

(c) Any fish, bird, or mammal so identified may be possessed and transported at any time during the period for which the tag or seal is valid.

(d) The fees for tags and seals shall be established by the commission in amounts which, in
 conjunction with fees collected pursuant to Section 3402, are calculated to meet the actual costs incurred by the department in administering all aspects of the habitat enhancement and management program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 67.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3408.

Any landholder who has paid the fee required by this article, has a valid license issued pursuant to this article, and who is conducting activities pursuant to an approved wildlife habitat enhancement and management plan that could be licensed or permitted pursuant to another provision of this code shall be exempt from any requirement to obtain that other license or permit or to pay any other fee. This section shall not, however, be construed to exempt anyone from any requirement pertaining to hunting and sport fishing licenses and stamps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 818, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Management of Fish and Wildlife on Military Lands [3450. - 3453.]

3450.

It is the policy of the state to actively encourage the biologically sound management of fish and other wildlife resources on lands administered by the United States Department of Defense. The department may develop a program to implement this article in cooperation with the military services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3451.

The department may coordinate and cooperate with all branches of the United States military service, Department of Defense, for the purpose of developing fish and wildlife management plans and programs on military installations. The plans and programs shall be designed to provide biologically optimum levels of fish and wildlife resource management and use compatible with the primary military use of those lands. Military lands involved in programs developed pursuant to this article shall not be available to the general public without the consent of the military service administering the lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3452.

The commission may adopt regulations and authorize the department to enter into agreements with the United States Department of Defense for the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3453.

(a) Upon approval of specific management plans and programs, which reflect the recommendations of the department, the commission may authorize actions and adopt regulations governing those actions pursuant to this article.

(b) The provisions of Sections 457, 458, 459, and 460 do not apply to regulations adopted under this article.

(c) The activities conducted pursuant to this program shall be reviewed annually by the department and the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. The California Waterfowl Habitat Program [3460. - 3467.5.]

3460.

(a) Subject to appropriation pursuant to Section 3467, the director may enter into contracts with nonpublic entities which are owners of record, or with lessees, who have the owners of record execute the contract, of land determined by the director to be important for the conservation of waterfowl. The contract shall enforceably restrict the use of the land for the conservation of waterfowl and their habitat consistent with Section 8 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(b) The director shall give priority to contracts that have the greatest potential for restoring, enhancing, and protecting high quality waterfowl habitat, especially that which is subject to destruction, drastic modification, or significant curtailment of habitat values.

(c) Contracts entered into pursuant to this section are not subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1425, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3461.

Each contract shall be for an initial term of 10 years and shall include all of the following:

(a) The designation of the owner of record and any lessee, and the legal description and the assessor’s parcel number of the land subject to the contract.

(b) An agreement by the owner and any lessee to restore, enhance, and protect the waterfowl habitat character of the described land and to carry out a waterfowl habitat management plan developed with the department.

(c) Specification of the amount and date in each year that the payment is to be made by the department to the owner or lessee, which shall be calculated at the rate or rates that the director determines to be fair and reasonable in consideration of the obligations undertaken by the owner or lessee.

(d) A requirement that the owner or lessee do either of the following:

(1) Refund to the state all payments received under the contract plus interest at the legal rate, as specified in Section 3289 of the Civil Code, upon the owner’s or lessee’s violation of the contract, or any extension thereof, if the director determines that the violation warrants termination of the contract and the director terminates the contract.

(2) Make refunds or accept payment adjustments that the director determines are appropriate, not to exceed the total amount paid by the state to the owner or lessee in the preceding calendar year plus interest at the legal rate, as specified in Section 3289 of the Civil Code, if the director determines that the violation by the owner or lessee does not warrant termination of the contract.

(e) A requirement that the department reduce the amount of any payment to the owner or lessee under subdivision (c) by an amount equal to the portion of any payment under the Federal Water Bank Program (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1301 et seq.) which the department determines to be in compensation for the same obligation undertaken by the owner under the water bank program.

(f) A requirement that the department monitor compliance with the management plan or contract with the United States Soil Conservation Service or other appropriate agency, entity, or person to monitor compliance with the management plan, and that the owner or lessee allows access for the monitoring.

(g) Any additional provisions that the director determines are desirable to effectuate the purposes of the program or to facilitate its administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3462.

(a) Not later than 20 days after the director has entered into a contract pursuant to this article, a copy of the contract particularly describing the subject habitat as required by subdivision (a) of Section 3461 shall be recorded by the department in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any portion of the areas subject to the contract is located. The contract shall be indexed by the recorder in the grantor-grantee index to the name of the owner of record as grantor and to the department as grantee.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 27383 of the Government Code, the department shall pay the fees for recording and indexing the contract, and the department shall deduct the amount paid from the amounts due to the
 owner under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 68.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3464.

The contract shall be automatically renewed in the same manner as contracts are renewed and extended, or noticed for nonrenewal, under the Williamson Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code). Upon the request of the owner or lessee, the director shall reexamine the payment rate for the contract at five-year intervals, considering the then current management costs and, with the concurrence of the owner or lessee, make any needed adjustments in rates for the remainder of the contract term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3465.

(a) If during the contract period the owner or lessee is divested of the use of the waterfowl habitat subject to the contract, the owner or lessee shall notify the department concurrent with that divestment. Any unearned payment shall immediately be refunded by the owner or lessee to the department.

(b) If the owner or lessee divests himself or herself of the use of the area subject to a contract by sale or otherwise, the person succeeding to that use is subject to all of the terms and conditions of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3466.

The director and the owner or lessee may mutually agree to modify the terms and conditions of a contract under this article as the director may determine to be desirable to carry out the purposes of, or to facilitate administration of, the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 69.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3467.

The California Waterfowl Habitat Preservation Account is hereby created in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund, and the money in the account shall be transferred to the Surplus Money Investment Fund for investment pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The proceeds of the investment deposited in the account shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure pursuant to this article. However, not more than 7 percent of the money appropriated from the account for expenditure in any fiscal year shall be expended in that fiscal year for administrative costs of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3467.5.

The Nesting Bird Habitat Incentive Program Account is hereby created in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. Moneys deposited in the Nesting Bird Habitat Incentive Program Account shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for the purposes of the Nesting Bird Habitat Incentive Program (Article 9 (commencing with Section 3480)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 521, Sec. 1.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. The California Winter Rice Habitat Incentive Program [3469. - 3469.8.]

3469.

(a) There is established the California Winter Rice Habitat Incentive Program subject to the requirements of this article.

(b) Subject to appropriation for purposes of this article, the director may enter into contracts with nonpublic entities that are owners of record or with lessees of productive agricultural rice lands that are winter flooded and that are determined by the director to be important for the conservation of waterfowl. The contract shall enforceably restrict the use of the land for the conservation of waterfowl and their habitat in a manner that allows for the use of the land for rice farming consistent with Section 8 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(c) The director shall give priority to contracts that have the greatest potential for restoring, enhancing, and protecting high-quality waterfowl habitat, especially that subject to destruction, drastic modification, or significant curtailment of habitat values. The director may give priority to contracts that provide additional environmental cobenefits, including cobenefits to species such as fish or snakes.

(d) (1) Before entering into a contract pursuant to this article, if the land proposed to be subject to the contract is located within five miles of a runway on a military base or international airport, the director shall consult with the applicable branch of the United States military or the operator of the international airport, as
 applicable.

(2) The department shall develop guidance and protocols regarding consultation conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) that addresses, at a minimum, notification, participation, and a procedure to request the director to reconsider a decision to enter into a contract pursuant to this article.

(e) Contracts entered into pursuant to this article are not subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code or the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program (Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code).

(f) For purposes of this article, “productive agricultural rice lands that are winter flooded” means a field that has been farmed to rice during each growing season before each of the winter flooding seasons contracted for flooding and is intentionally
 maintained in a flooded state. When possible, flooding should last for at least 70 days between October 15 and February 1, inclusive, of the following year.

(g) To implement the California Winter Rice Habitat Incentive Program, the department may do both of the following:

(1) Enter into grants or contracts directly with landowners or lessees.

 (2) Enter into agreements with public and private entities and California Native American tribes, as defined in Section 21073 of the Public Resources Code, that possess demonstrated experience and
 understanding of California rice farming practices and wildlife-related conservation practices to help the department implement the program. Pursuant to these agreements, the public and private entities and California Native American tribes may enter into grants or contracts with landowners or lessees to carry out the purposes of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 521, Sec. 2.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3469.2.

Each contract shall be for an initial term of three years and shall include the following:

(a) The designation of the owner of record or the lessee, and the legal description and the assessor’s parcel number of the land subject to the contract.

(b) An agreement by the owner or the lessee to restore, enhance, and protect the waterfowl habitat character of an established number of acres of described land that may be annually rotated provided that the minimum contracted acreage amount is achieved for each of the contracted winter flooding seasons.

(c) Specification of the amount and date in each year that the payment is to be made by the department to the owner
 or lessee, which shall be calculated at the rate or rates that the director determines to be fair and reasonable in consideration of the obligations undertaken by the owner or lessee.

(d) A requirement that the owner or lessee do either of the following:

(1) Refund to the state all payments received under the contract plus interest at the legal rate, as specified in Section 3289 of the Civil Code, upon the owner’s or lessee’s violation of the contract, or any extension thereof, if the director determines that the violation warrants termination of the contract and the director terminates the contract.

(2) Make refunds or accept payment adjustments that the director determines are appropriate, not to exceed the total amount paid by the state to the owner or lessee in the preceding calendar year plus interest at the
 legal rate, as specified in Section 3289 of the Civil Code, if the director determines that the violation by the owner or lessee does not warrant termination of the contract.

(e) A requirement that the department reduce the amount of any payment to the owner or lessee under subdivision (c) by an amount equal to the portion of any payment under the federal Water Bank Program (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1301 et seq.) that the department determines to be in compensation for the same obligation undertaken by the owner under the water bank program.

(f) In addition to subdivision (e), a requirement that the department reduce the amount of any payment to the owner or lessee under subdivision (c) by an amount equal to the portion of any payment that the department determines to be in compensation for the same obligation undertaken by the owner under any other governmental program.

(g) An authorization for the department to monitor compliance with the contract with the federal Natural Resources Conservation Service, a county agricultural commissioner, or other appropriate agency, entity, or person to monitor compliance with the contract, and a requirement that the owner or lessee allow access for the monitoring.

(h) Any additional provisions that the director determines are desirable to effectuate the purposes of the program or to facilitate its administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 420, Sec. 2.   (AB 256)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3469.4.

If during the contract period the owner or lessee is divested of the use of the waterfowl habitat subject to the contract, the owner or lessee shall notify the department concurrent with that divestment. Any unearned payment shall immediately be refunded by the owner or lessee to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 649, Sec. 2.   (AB 2348)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3469.6.

The director and the owner or lessee may mutually agree to modify the terms and conditions of a contract under this article as the director may determine to be desirable to carry out the purposes of, or to facilitate administration of, the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 649, Sec. 2.   (AB 2348)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3469.8.

The California Winter Rice Habitat Incentive Program Account is hereby created in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. Funds deposited in the California Winter Rice Habitat Incentive Program Account shall be made available for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department. These funds shall be expended solely for the purposes set forth in this article. An amount that equals not more than 5 percent of the funds allocated for this program may be used to pay the administrative costs of the program and up to 10 percent of funds allocated may be used for planning and monitoring necessary to ensure the success of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 649, Sec. 2.   (AB 2348)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Management of Wildlife at Public Use Airports [3470. - 3472.2.]

3470.

It is the policy of the state to actively encourage the safe and biologically sound management of wildlife resources on California’s public use airports as regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) and its agents. The Legislature recognizes that public use airports serving in the United States are operated according to regulations and policies promulgated by the FAA and federal law that protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public in compliance with applicable FAA regulations, standards, policies, and guidance, wildlife hazard management plans, and associated permits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   (SB 481)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3471.

The Legislature recognizes that, in a public use airport’s ongoing efforts to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the traveling public in compliance with Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) regulations, and specifically Section 337 of Part 139 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, it is necessary to perform limited and authorized wildlife hazing, harassment, and depredation. The Legislature further recognizes that FAA certificated public use airports and their wildlife hazard management staff must harass, haze, or perform removal of species to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public when authorized by a current, valid federal fish and wildlife depredation permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   (SB 481)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3472.

The taking of birds by a public use airport certificated by the Federal Aviation Administration to operate in California that has obtained, and is in compliance with, a federal depredation permit that authorizes, under specified conditions, the lawful taking of birds, does not violate any provision of this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code if the taking is in compliance with the federal depredation permit for the purposes specified in Section 3472.1 and all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The taking occurs on lands owned or leased by the airport.

(b) The taking does not occur on lands owned or leased by the airport that are reserved for habitat mitigation or conservation
 purposes of the species being taken, including lands in a habitat conservation plan, or a natural communities conservation plan.

(c) There is no taking of a fully protected, candidate, threatened, or endangered species.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   (SB 481)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3472.1.

Take is authorized pursuant to this article only to relieve or prevent injurious situations affecting public safety and shall only be performed as part of an integrated wildlife management program that emphasizes nonlethal management techniques.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   (SB 481)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3472.2.

A public use airport certificated by the Federal Aviation Administration shall provide to the department any federal depredation permit and all federal reports required pursuant to any federal depredation permit or wildlife hazard management plan, or both, and shall also provide reasonable access to the department for purposes of ensuring compliance with this article. The department shall seek reimbursement from the public use airport for any reasonable costs associated with activities resulting from any violations of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   (SB 481)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Nesting Bird Habitat Incentive Program [3480. - 3480.]

3480.

(a) (1) The department shall establish the Nesting Bird Habitat Incentive Program, which may include direct payments or other incentives, to encourage landowners to voluntarily cultivate or retain upland cover crops, cereal grains, grasses, forbs, pollinator plants, or a combination thereof to provide waterfowl and other game bird nesting habitat cover, including, but not limited to, for the purposes described in Section 1018 of the Water Code.

(2) The program is established for waterfowl, ring-necked pheasant, and other game bird breeding purposes and shall not be used to provide managed wetland habitat, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1506,
 for wintering waterfowl habitat purposes.

(3) For purposes of this section, “landowner” means any entity with authority to manage real property to provide waterfowl, ring-necked pheasant, and other game bird nesting habitat cover.

(b) The department may develop guidelines and criteria for the Nesting Bird Habitat Incentive Program as it deems appropriate, but shall ensure that the guidelines and criteria are flexible enough to meet landowner needs. The program shall do all of the following:

(1) Prohibit a landowner who participates in the program and has committed to leaving the established upland cover crops, cereal grains, grasses, forbs, pollinator plants, or a combination thereof in place after April 1 from
 engaging in practices, such as discing, spraying of herbicides, mowing, chopping, or rolling any vegetation on those lands until after July 15, or as late as possible each year, to address waterfowl nesting, upland game bird habitat, and other wildlife needs.

(2) Give priority to grants or contracts with landowners that include lands adjacent to, or in close proximity to, waterfowl brood habitat, including, but not limited to, areas flooded during the spring or summer for the cultivation of rice, State Wildlife Areas, National Wildlife Refuges, and private wetlands enrolled in the California Waterfowl Habitat Program (Article 7 (commencing with Section 3460)).

(3) Be consistent with the waterfowl habitat breeding goals and objectives of the Central Valley Joint Venture Implementation Plan,